District of Columbia statutes.
2-1404.02

Purpose and functions.

The Commission shall serve as an impartial forum for the hearing and deciding of cases of unlawful discrimination in employment, real estate transactions, public accommodations, or educational institutions. The Commission shall hear such cases following a determination by the Office that there is probable cause to believe that an act of unlawful discrimination has occurred. In hearing and deciding such cases, the Commission shall follow the procedures set forth and use, in its discretion, the powers and authority provided in subchapter III of Unit A of this chapter.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title IV, § 402
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-216, § 2(b), 51 DCR 9123